Maine, session 132, LD1855.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §2, sub-§31-E is enacted to read:
31-E. Spirits-based cocktail. "Spirits-based cocktail" means an alcoholic beverage
containing spirits that has no more than 12% of alcohol by volume.
Sec. 2. 28-A MRSA §1652, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §264, is further
amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§1652. Excise tax on malt liquor, spirits-based cocktails and wine; deficiency account;
credits; refunds
Sec. 3. 28-A MRSA §1652, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Excise tax on spirits-based cocktail. An excise tax is imposed on the privilege
of manufacturing and selling spirits-based cocktails in the State. Except as provided in
subsection 2‑A, the in-state manufacturer or importing wholesale licensee shall pay an
excise tax of 60¢ per gallon on all spirits-based cocktails manufactured in or imported into
the State.
Sec. 4. 28-A MRSA §1652, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 8, §10, is further
amended to read:
2-A. Excise tax due; exemption. On the 15th day of each month, every brewery and
winery shall pay the excise taxes due on malt liquor, wine, spirits-based cocktails and low-
alcohol spirits products that that brewery or winery removed from areas required to be
bonded by the Federal Government. Malt liquor, wine, spirits-based cocktails or low-
alcohol spirits products that a brewery or winery removes from areas required to be bonded
by the Federal Government for sale to an out-of-state wholesaler for resale in another state
or for sale under section 1357 directly to a consumer located in another state are exempt
from excise tax under this section.
Sec. 5. 28-A MRSA §1652, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §264, is
further amended to read:
4. Excise tax accounts and adjustments. The bureau shall open an excise tax account
with each wholesale licensee and each certificate of approval holder and make the
following adjustments when appropriate. As used in this subsection, "certificate of
approval holder" means an in-state manufacturer of malt liquor, wine, spirits-based
cocktails or low-alcohol spirits products licensed under section 1355‑A or an out-of-state
manufacturer of or out-of-state wholesaler of malt liquor, wine, spirits-based cocktails or
low-alcohol spirits products that has been issued a certificate of approval under section
1361.
A. The bureau may grant credits and make tax adjustments that it determines the
wholesale licensee or certificate of approval holder is entitled to upon the filing of
affidavits in the form prescribed by the bureau.
B. The bureau shall refund all excise tax paid by the wholesale licensee or certificate
of approval holder on all malt liquor, wine, spirits-based cocktails or low-alcohol spirits
products that have been destroyed as long as the quantity and size are verified by the
bureau and the destruction is witnessed by an authorized representative of the bureau.
Page 1 - 132LR0950(01)

C. If a wholesale licensee's inventories are destroyed by fire, flood or other natural
disaster, the bureau may refund the excise tax on the wholesale licensee's inventories.
D. Any wholesale licensee selling malt liquor, wine, spirits-based cocktails or low-
alcohol spirits products to an instrumentality, a licensee for resale to an airline, a
training site or a ship chandler shall present proof of that sale to the bureau. The bureau
shall grant to the wholesale licensee a credit of all state excise tax paid in connection
with that sale under the following conditions.
(1) The bureau shall grant a credit for the excise tax on malt liquor, wine, spirits-
based cocktails or low-alcohol spirits products sold by wholesale licensees to any
instrumentality of the United States or any Maine National Guard state training site
exempted by the bureau.
(2) The bureau shall grant a credit for the excise tax on malt liquor, wine, spirits-
based cocktails or low-alcohol spirits products sold to any ship chandler as long as
the malt liquor, wine, spirits-based cocktails and low-alcohol spirits products are
resold to vessels of foreign registry for consumption after that vessel has left port
or are resold for consumption on board vessels of United States registry that are
destined for a foreign port.
(3) The bureau shall grant a credit for the excise tax on malt liquor, wine, spirits-
based cocktails and low-alcohol spirits products sold to a licensee registered with
the bureau for resale to licensed airlines or to unlicensed airlines for their
international flights.